Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 2 Licensing

20-2-1.
General.

The director may issue those licenses required under this title for hunting, fishing, and the taking of fish, game, birds, shellfish, lobsters, or other wild animals within this state and its territorial waters, pursuant to those regulations that the director deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this title. The director may, in his or her discretion, appoint responsible citizens or corporations of the state, or of adjoining states, engaged in operating sporting goods stores to act as agents with authority to issue licenses in the manner and under the conditions as set forth below. Before an appointment shall occur, that citizen or corporation of the state or of adjoining states shall deliver to the director a bond with a surety company authorized to do business in the state of Rhode Island. The requirements and conditions of the bond shall be established by regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 253, § 1.

20-2-1.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 1, effective April 30, 2004; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 1, effective May 25, 2004.

20-2-2.
Issuance of licenses.

Any person or corporation appointed by the director as provided in §

20-2-1

shall, upon the application of any person entitled to receive a license under this chapter and upon payment of the specified license fee, register and issue to that person a license, either printed or displayed electronically on a mobile device, so long as the certificate provides all of the information requested in the data fields identified by the department. The certificate shall bear the name, age, occupation, place of residence, signature, and identifying description of the registrant and shall authorize the registrant to fish or shellfish, or to pursue, hunt, and kill game in the state of Rhode Island during those seasons and in those manners and according to those conditions, as shall be provided by law; provided, however, that these authorized agents shall not have authority to issue lobster, commercial shellfish, or commercial fishing licenses of any kind.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 14; P.L. 2016, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 350, § 1.

20-2-2.1.
Expiration date.

The expiration date of any license issued pursuant to this chapter shall be stamped on the license and not handwritten.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 278, § 2.

20-2-3.
Record of licenses issued — Accounting for fees.

Every city and town clerk or agent appointed under this chapter shall record all licenses issued under this chapter in books kept for that purpose, one coupon of which shall be retained in his or her record. The books shall be supplied by the department; shall remain the property of the state; shall be open to public inspection during the usual office hours of the clerk or appointee; and shall be subject at all times to audit and inspection by the director, by the director of administration, or by the agents of either. Each of these clerks or appointees shall, on the first Monday of every month, pay to the department all moneys received by the clerk or appointee for the registrations issued during the month preceding, except for recording fee, together with a receipted bill for fees retained in accordance with §

20-2-4

, and shall, within thirty (30) days succeeding January first of each year, return to the department all registration books and unused and void certificates. The director shall pay the money received to the general treasurer with a list of the number and kind of registrations recorded by each city and town clerk or agent during the month.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 24.

20-2-4.
Authorized agents fee.

Out of the fees paid under the provisions of this chapter for issuance of hunting, other than deer permits pursuant to §

20-2-18

, fishing, combination, and nonresident shellfishing licenses, the sum of one dollar ($1.00) shall be retained by the authorized agent issuing each license, if this is the case. Out of the fees paid for issuance of deer permits, the sum of fifty cents ($.50) shall be retained by the authorized agent. Authorized agents are any persons, including a municipality, who have currently been granted authority by the director to sell hunting and fishing licenses pursuant to chapter 2 of title 20, in compliance with the governing regulations that have been duly promulgated by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 16; P.L. 2016, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 136, § 1.

20-2-4.1.
Authorized internet agent.

The director is authorized and directed to engage the contractual services of a state-approved vendor to develop and implement a web-based system that will serve as a means for obtaining licenses pursuant to this chapter. The vendor’s responsibilities shall include, but not be limited to:

Development of the web-based application;

Creation and servicing of authorized licensing agents who will be able to vend licenses at their establishments;

Collection and transmittal of license fee revenues;

Storage and transmittal of the license holder database; and

Authority to sell hunting and fishing licenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 130, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 136, § 3.

20-2-5.
Replacement of lost or destroyed certificate.

Whoever loses, or by a mistake or accident destroys, his or her certificate of a commercial marine fisheries license may, upon application to the department accompanied by an affidavit fully setting forth the circumstances of the loss, receive a duplicate certificate for the remainder of the year covered by the original certificate for a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each duplicate license.

Whoever loses, or by mistake or accident destroys, his or her certificate of a noncommercial license may, upon application to the department accompanied by an affidavit fully setting forth the circumstances of loss, receive a duplicate certificate for the remainder of the year covered by the original certificate for a fee of two dollars ($2.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1.

20-2-6.
Appropriation of license fees.

All moneys derived from payments received from freshwater fishing, hunting, and combination licenses and permits in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited with the general treasurer and are appropriated to the department for the protection and propagation of fish and game; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of any sum, or sums, as may be necessary, from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of duly authenticated vouchers presented by the director of environmental management; provided, however, nothing in this section shall be construed to deprive the city and town clerks and agents of their recording fees. The sum of two dollars ($2.00) from the sale of each license and permit shall be placed in a special fund for the acquisition, stewardship, and development of fish and wildlife lands.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 318, § 1.

20-2-7.
Use of license proceeds.

The moneys received under §

20-2-6

are to be used for the following specific purposes:

Leasing and purchase of land and rights-of-way to streams and ponds to be stocked with fish by the department and to be opened to public fishing;

For stream improvement;

For the enforcement of fish and game laws;

For the protection and propagation of fish and game; and

For the leasing and purchase of land or acquisition of conservation easements for the purpose of creating wildlife reservations and protecting wildlife habitats.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-2-7.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 13, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 15, effective July 22, 1998.

20-2-8.
False statements and violations — Cancellation of license.

Any person who willfully makes a false representation as to birthplace or requirements of identification or of other facts required in an application for license under this chapter, or is any way directly or indirectly a party to such a false representation, shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00). A license obtained by any person through such a false representation shall be null and void, and the license shall be surrendered immediately to the director. No license shall be issued under this title to this person for a period of one year from the date of conviction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-2-9.
Possession, inspection, and display of license.

Every person holding a license issued under this chapter shall have that license in his or her possession at all times while engaged in the licensed activity and shall present the license for inspection on demand by any authorized person. In the case of freshwater fishing, the licensee shall wear in any manner plainly visible upon the licensee’s person while fishing, an identifying device as the director may prescribe, the device to be furnished by the director at a minimum cost to the licensee. Any person who shall refuse to present a license on demand shall be liable to the same punishment as if that person were hunting or fishing without a license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-2-10.
Endorsement of license.

No license issued under this chapter shall be valid until endorsed by the licensee in his or her own handwriting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-2-11.
Transfer or loan of license.

Unless otherwise provided in this title, a license issued to a person under this chapter shall be good only for the person to whom it is issued; and any transfer or loan of the license shall be grounds for revocation or suspension of that license pursuant to §

20-2-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-2-12.
Application for license.

Every person entitled to a license under this chapter shall file an application with the director, or the director’s authorized agent, or any city or town clerk, properly sworn to, stating the name, age, occupation, place of residence, nationality, weight, height, and color of hair and eyes of the applicant for whom the license is wanted and pay the fees as provided in this chapter. All licenses issued under this chapter shall be valid only for the calendar year of issuance, unless otherwise specified in this title or in the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-2-13.
License revocation.

The license of any person who has violated the provisions of this title or the rules and regulations issued pursuant to this title may be suspended or revoked by the director in any manner and for any period as the director shall determine by regulation. Any person aggrieved by an order of suspension or revocation may appeal this order in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-2-14.
Licenses — Expiration.

Unless otherwise specified in this title, all licenses issued under this title shall be annual and shall expire on December 31 of every year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 242, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 2.

20-2-15.
Freshwater fishing license.

Resident: twenty-one dollars ($21.00); commencing July 1, 2025, twenty-four dollars ($24.00); commencing July 1, 2028, twenty-seven dollars ($27.00).

Nonresident: thirty-eight dollars ($38.00); commencing July 1, 2025, forty-one dollars ($41.00); commencing July 1, 2028, forty-four dollars ($44.00).

Nonresident tourist: eighteen dollars ($18.00); commencing July 1, 2025, twenty dollars ($20.00); commencing July 1, 2028, twenty-two dollars ($22.00). This license shall entitle the licensee to fish in Rhode Island for three (3) consecutive days including the day of issue.

Freshwater fishing licenses shall expire on the last day of February of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 549, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 16; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

20-2-16.
Hunting license.

Resident: twenty-one dollars ($21.00); commencing July 1, 2025, twenty-four dollars ($24.00); commencing July 1, 2028, twenty-seven dollars ($27.00).

Nonresident: fifty-five dollars ($55.00); commencing July 1, 2025, sixty-five dollars ($65.00); commencing July 1, 2028, seventy-five dollars ($75.00).

Nonresident landowner: a nonresident citizen of the United States and owner of real estate in Rhode Island assessed for taxation at a valuation of not less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) may obtain a resident’s hunting license.

Shooting preserve: three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50).

Nonresident three (3) day: twenty dollars ($20.00). This license shall entitle the licensee to hunt in Rhode Island for three (3) consecutive days as validated by the issuing agent.

Resident junior hunting license: fourteen dollars ($14.00).

Nonresident junior hunting license: forty dollars ($40.00).

Hunting licenses shall expire on the last day of February of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 549, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 16; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

20-2-16.1.
Shooting preserves.

The annual license fee for operating a shooting preserve shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 30, § 2.

20-2-17.
Combination fishing and hunting license.

The director may grant to any eligible resident applying for a combination hunting and fishing license a license that shall entitle the licensee to the privileges of both hunting and fishing licenses, for a fee of thirty-eight dollars ($38.00); commencing July 1, 2025, forty-three dollars ($43.00); commencing July 1, 2028, forty-eight dollars ($48.00). The license shall expire on the last day of February of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1986, ch. 549, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 16; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

20-2-18.
Deer permits.

Resident: thirteen dollars ($13.00); commencing July 1, 2025, fourteen dollars ($14.00); commencing July 1, 2028, fifteen dollars ($15.00).

Nonresident: twenty-six dollars and fifty cents ($26.50); commencing July 1, 2025, twenty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($27.50); commencing July 1, 2028, twenty-eight dollars and fifty cents ($28.50).

A deer permit is good only for the season in which it is issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 16; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

20-2-18.1.
Wild turkey permits.

No person shall attempt to take any wild turkey without first obtaining a regular hunting license and a turkey permit for the current year. Permits shall be sold at the direction of the director for a fee of eight dollars ($8.00) for residents and twenty-one dollars and fifty cents ($21.50) for nonresidents. Commencing July 1, 2025, permits shall be sold for a fee of nine dollars ($9.00) for residents and twenty-three dollars ($23.00) for nonresidents. Commencing July 1, 2028, permits shall be sold for a fee of ten dollars and fifty cents ($10.50) for residents and twenty-four dollars and fifty cents ($24.50) for nonresidents. The issuing agent may retain a fee of fifty cents ($.50) for each permit and shall remit the remainder to the department.

A wild turkey permit shall be good only for the season in which it is issued.

All monies derived by the department from the sale of wild turkey permits shall be expended for turkey habitat acquisition in Rhode Island and wild turkey restoration management and research.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

20-2-18.2.
Stocked game bird permits required.

No person shall attempt to take any stocked game bird without first obtaining a regular hunting license and a stocked game bird permit for the current year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2011, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 403, § 1.

20-2-18.3.
Stocked game bird permit fees and bag limits.

Permits shall be sold at the direction of the director for a fee of seventeen dollars ($17.00). Commencing July 1, 2025, the fee for a permit shall be eighteen dollars and fifty cents ($18.50). Commencing July 1, 2028, the fee for a permit shall be twenty-one dollars ($21.00). The issuing agent will retain a fee of fifty cents ($0.50) for each permit and shall remit the remainder to the department. The permit will allow the person to harvest a daily bag and season limit as described in regulations promulgated by the director. All monies derived by the department from the sale of stocked game bird permits shall be expended for stocking game birds and wildlife habitat acquisition in Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2011, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 403, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

20-2-19.
Commercial minnow license.

The fee for a commercial minnow license shall be twenty dollars ($20.00). The license is valid only during the season in which it is issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-2-20.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 445, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 3, effective January 1, 2003.

20-2-21.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 3, effective January 1, 2003.

20-2-22.
Nonresident’s noncommercial shellfish license.

Every nonresident over the age of twelve (12) years may obtain a nonresident, noncommercial annual shellfish license for a fee of two hundred dollars ($200).

A nonresident may obtain one noncommercial limited license per calendar year covering fourteen (14) days, including the date of issue, for eleven dollars ($11.00).

A nonresident must obtain a shellfish landing license, for a fee of two hundred dollars ($200), to land shellfish (surf clams, blue mussels, ocean quahaugs, sea scallops) harvested outside Rhode Island waters.

A nonresident landowner, as defined in §

20-1-3(a)(5)

, who owns residential real estate in Rhode Island assessed for taxation at a valuation of not less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) may, with proof of residential property ownership in the form of a current tax bill from a town or city hall showing that the nonresident landowner is current in his or her property tax obligation, obtain an annual, noncommercial, nonresident shellfish license for a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 78, § 2.

20-2-23.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 3, effective January 1, 2003.

20-2-24.
Recreational lobster license.

Noncommercial pot: forty dollars ($40.00). The license is issued only to a legal resident of the state of Rhode Island.

Noncommercial divers: forty dollars ($40.00). The license is issued only to a legal resident of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 2.

20-2-25.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1985, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 3, effective January 1, 2003.

20-2-26.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 3, effective January 1, 2003.

20-2-26.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 305, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 3, effective January 1, 2003.

20-2-27.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 58, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 3, effective January 1, 2003.

20-2-27.1.
Rhode Island party and charter vessel license.

All party and charter vessels carrying recreational passengers to take or attempt to take marine species upon the navigable state and coastal waters of Rhode Island shall be required to obtain a Rhode Island party and charter vessel license. The annual fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for a resident of Rhode Island and shall be three hundred dollars ($300) for a nonresident. All licensed party and charter vessels shall be required to display a party and charter vessel decal provided by the department. To obtain a license, the owner of a qualified vessel must submit:

A current copy of the operator’s United States Coast Guard license to carry passengers for hire;

A current copy of the vessel’s “Certificate of Documentation” certifying that the vessel is documented “Coastwise,” or if the vessel is under five (5) net tons, a copy of the vessel’s state registration;

Proof that the operator and crew are currently enrolled in a random drug testing program that complies with the federal government’s 46 C.F.R. § 16.101 et seq. “Drug Testing Program” regulations; and

A signed license application form certifying that the vessel is and will be operated in compliance with all state and federal safety regulations for the vessel.

Rhode Island party and charter vessel licenses shall expire on the last day of December every year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 24; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 3, effective July 6, 2021.

20-2-27.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 58, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 3, effective January 1, 2003.

20-2-28.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 58, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 3, effective January 1, 2003.

20-2-28.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 3, effective January 1, 2003.

20-2-28.2.
Deposit of fees.

In any fiscal year, moneys generated from license fees and vessel fees, provided for in §§

20-2-22

and

20-2-24

and chapter 2.1 of this title, over and above the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) through June 30, 2003, and on or after July 1, 2003, the full amount shall be deposited with the general treasurer and appropriated to the department of environmental management. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for payment of any sum, or sums, as may be necessary, from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of duly authenticated vouchers presented by the director of environmental management. The moneys received under this section, consistent with an annual plan for the allocation and use of said funds adopted by the department with the advice of the marine fisheries council, are to be used only for the purpose of fishery conservation and restoration and resource enhancement, a minimum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003, and each fiscal year thereafter, and for the following specific purposes:

For protection and propagation of marine fish, lobsters, and shellfish;

For additional enforcement of the marine fishery regulations;

For transplanting shellfish from closed areas or enhancing the shellfish resource through other technologies including seeding;

For fishing port development and construction;

For staff support of, and expenses incurred by, the marine fisheries council;

For lease and purchase of land or acquisition of conservation easements; and

For technical support to, and expenses incurred by, the department for the collection, processing, analysis, and maintenance of data for fisheries management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 188, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 2.

20-2-29.
Commercial game licenses.

Artificial propagation and sale of live game: twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Raising game for liberation: five dollars ($5.00).

Sale of carcasses of domestic game birds: twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-2-30.
Fur trapping and licenses.

Fur trapper — Resident: fifteen dollars ($15.00); commencing July 1, 2025, twenty dollars ($20.00); commencing July 1, 2028, twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Fur trapper — Nonresident: fifty dollars ($50.00); commencing July 1, 2025, seventy-five dollars ($75.00); commencing July 1, 2028, one hundred dollars ($100.00).

Fur trapper and fur licenses expire on the last day of March of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 20, § 16; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

20-2-31.
Hunting and fishing licenses — Exceptions.

Every valid license to hunt or fish in this state that is held by any resident of this state upon joining the armed forces or the merchant marine of the United States is hereby extended and is in force and valid until six (6) months following the termination of his or her service.

Every member of the armed forces or of the merchant marine of the United States may hunt or fish in this state if that person procures a hunting or fishing license issued by the state of Rhode Island, the fee for which is that charged for a resident civilian.

Every man or woman who was a part of the armed forces of the United States government and is now a one hundred percent (100%) disabled veteran, and any man or woman who is one hundred percent (100%) permanently disabled, is entitled, subject to the provisions of this title, to receive a license to hunt or fish or both in this state; and upon the presentation of his or her necessary military discharge identification or disability papers or both, as prescribed by the department of environmental management, shall, at the discretion of the licensing authority, receive, without the payment of any license fee, a continuing special form of license authorizing the man or woman to hunt or fish or both in this state in accordance with the provisions of this title and regulations issued pursuant to this title for so long as he or she so desires; provided, however, that the man or woman, having once made application for this license, shall not again be required to appear before the licensing authority to present his or her papers.

A freshwater fishing license is not required of any blind person. For the purposes of this section, a person is blind only if his or her central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lenses or if his or her visual acuity is greater than 20/200 but is accompanied by a limitation in the fields of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than twenty degrees (20°).

Every resident man or woman over the age of sixty-five (65) years is entitled, subject to the provisions of this title and the regulations issued pursuant to this title, to receive a special permanent license to hunt or fish or both in this state for which there is no fee.

Any man or woman who is one hundred percent (100%) permanently disabled may apply to receive a license to fish in this state, and upon presentation of a proof of his or her disability as prescribed by the department of environmental management, receive, without the payment of any license fee, a continuing special form of license authorizing the man or woman to fish in this state for so long as he or she so desires; provided, however, that the man or woman, having once made application for this license, shall not again be required to appear before the licensing authority to present his or her papers.

The director may, by regulation, designate no more than two (2) days in each year, which may or may not be consecutive, during which residents and nonresidents may, without having a license and without payment of any fee, exercise the privileges of a holder of a freshwater fishing license. These persons are subject to all other limitations, restrictions, conditions, laws, rules, and regulations applicable to the holder of a freshwater fishing license.

For the purpose of this section, “man or woman who is one hundred percent (100%) permanently disabled” means an individual who has a physical or mental impairment and is receiving:

Social Security Disability Insurance Benefits (SSDI);

Supplemental Security Income benefits (SSI).

All licenses that are issued to persons who qualify pursuant to this subsection shall be issued without the requirement of the payment of a fee and shall expire annually on February 28 of each year. Persons seeking the issuance or reissuance of licenses shall be required to present documentation establishing that the applicant is qualified, or remains qualified, pursuant to this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 127, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 308, art. 2, § 5.

20-2-32.
Inspections condition of license.

All persons granted a license under the provisions of this chapter are deemed to have consented to the reasonable inspection of any boat, vessel, net, rake, bullrake, tong, dredge, trap, pot, vehicle, structure, or other contrivance used regularly for the keeping or storage of fish, shellfish, crustaceans, or any game bag firearms, creel, box, locker, basket, crate, blind, stand, or hunting, fishing, or trapping paraphernalia used in conjunction with the licensed activity by persons duly authorized by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 214, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 254, § 1.

20-2-33.
Altering and counterfeiting a license.

Every person who falsely makes, alters, forges, or counterfeits, or who causes to be made, altered, forged, or counterfeited, a license issued under this title, or purporting to be a license issued under this title, or who shall have in his or her possession such a false, altered, forged, or counterfeit license, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to the penalties prescribed in §

20-1-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 214, § 2.

20-2-34.
Definitions.

As used in §§

20-2-34

—

20-2-38

:

“Migratory waterfowl” means all waterfowl species in the family anatidae, including wild ducks, geese, brant, and swans.

“Stamp” means the state migratory waterfowl hunting stamp furnished by the division of fish and wildlife as provided for in these sections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 663, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 31.

20-2-35.
Waterfowl stamp required.

No person sixteen (16) years of age or older shall take, or attempt to take, any migratory waterfowl without first obtaining a regular hunting license and a Rhode Island migratory waterfowl stamp for the current year. Each stamp shall be validated by the signature of the licensee written in ink across the face of the stamp and shall not be transferable. The stamp year shall run from July 1 to June 30. The migratory waterfowl stamp shall be available at all outlets currently used for the issuance of a hunting license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 663, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 16.

20-2-36.
Waterfowl stamp design, production, and distribution.

The director of the department of environmental management shall be responsible for the design, production, procurement, distribution, and sale of all stamps and all marketable stamp by-products such as posters, artwork, calendars, and other items.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 663, § 1.

20-2-37.
Waterfowl stamp fees.

Stamps shall be sold at the direction of the director for a fee of eight dollars ($8.00). Commencing July 1, 2025, the fee for a stamp shall be nine dollars ($9.00). Commencing July 1, 2028, the fee for a stamp shall be ten dollars ($10.00). The issuing agent may retain a fee of fifty cents ($.50) for each stamp and shall remit the remainder of each fee to the department. The director shall establish a uniform sale price for all categories of by-products.

[Deleted by P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 16.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 663, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 16; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

20-2-38.
Disposition of waterfowl receipts.

All waterfowl stamp receipts, and all receipts from the sale of stamp by-products, shall be deposited in a special waterfowl fund. All stamp and by-products receipts shall be expended through the appropriations process for waterfowl habitat, acquisition, improvement, and research projects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 663, § 1.

20-2-38.1.
Grants, donations, and gifts to the waterfowl fund.

The director is authorized to accept any grant, devise, bequest, donation, gift or assignment of money, bonds, or other valuable securities for deposit in the waterfowl fund, which may be accepted for specific use(s) that the grant and grantee may jointly identify within the purposes of the waterfowl fund, or for the general purposes of the fund. The director may also accept land as provided in §

20-18-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 17.

20-2-39.
Definitions.

As used in §§

20-2-39

—

20-2-43

, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Stamp” means a Rhode Island trout conservation stamp issued by the division of fish and wildlife as provided for in §

20-2-41

; and

“Trout” means any fish species in the family salmonidae including all species of trout, salmon, and charr.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 2.

20-2-40.
Trout conservation stamp required.

No person fifteen (15) years of age or older shall take any trout without first obtaining a regular fishing license and a Rhode Island trout conservation stamp for the current year. Each stamp shall be validated by signature of the licensee written in ink across the face of the stamp, shall not be transferable, and shall be in his or her possession while engaged in the activity permitted under the terms of the license and stamp. The stamp year shall run from March 1 to the last day in February. The trout conservation stamp shall be available at all outlets currently used for the issuance of the fishing license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 2.

20-2-41.
Trout conservation stamp design, production, and distribution.

The director of the department of environmental management shall adopt and shall be responsible for the design, production, procurement, distribution, and sale of all trout conservation stamps and all marketable stamp by-products such as posters, artwork, calendars, and other items.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 2.

20-2-42.
Trout conservation stamp fee.

Stamps shall be sold at the direction of the director for a fee of five dollars and fifty cents ($5.50). Commencing July 1, 2025, the fee for a stamp shall be six dollars ($6.00). Commencing July 1, 2028, the fee for a stamp shall be six dollars and fifty cents ($6.50). The issuing agent may retain a fee of fifty cents ($.50) for each stamp sold and shall remit the remainder of each fee to the department. The director shall establish uniform sale prices for all categories of by-products.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

20-2-43.
Disposition of trout conservation stamp receipts.

All trout conservation stamp receipts, and all receipts from the sale of stamp by-products, shall be deposited in a special trout conservation fund. All stamp and stamp by-products receipts shall be expended through the appropriations process for operations, trout habitat including acquisition, improvement research, and culture projects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 17, § 2.

20-2-44.
Shellfish transplant program.

In addition to any appropriation made pursuant to §

20-2-28.2

, the general assembly shall appropriate from the general fund to the division of marine fisheries the amount it deems necessary for the purpose of maintaining a shellfish transplant program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, and thereafter, the division of marine fisheries shall develop a sustainable shellfish management plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 468, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 191, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 242, § 3.

20-2-45.
Narragansett Bay Oyster Restoration Act.

Findings of fact. The general assembly hereby finds and declares the following:

Oyster fishery has historically been important to Rhode Island for economic and ecosystem benefits;

The Rhode Island oyster fishery has been in deep decline and is a fraction of its historical levels due to disease;

The development of indigenous, disease-resistant oyster brood stock will assist in the restoration of the oyster population in Narragansett Bay;

The plantings of indigenous, disease-resistant oyster shellfish seed stock will increase the Narragansett Bay’s oyster population and annual harvest; and

An increase in oyster population will have a positive impact on the state’s economy and the overall health of Narragansett Bay and its ecosystem.

Authority to solicit federal funds for oyster restoration. The general assembly hereby vests in the director of the department of environmental management, acting through the division of marine fisheries, authority and responsibility to solicit annual federal funding, including, but not limited to, funding from the United States departments of Interior, Agriculture and Commerce for purposes of developing, restoring, and maintaining both the oyster population and oyster habitats in and around Narragansett Bay.

Program to achieve oyster restoration in Narragansett Bay. The director of the department of environmental management shall work in conjunction with the aquaculture coordinator located in the coastal resources management council to develop programs that address the declining oyster population in Narragansett Bay and which programs shall further promote the development, restoration, and maintenance of the oyster population and oyster habitats in and around Narragansett Bay, as set forth in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 191, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 242, § 3.